Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,131
Mixed martial arts, defined.

For purposes of sections 81-8,128 to 81-8,142.01, mixed martial arts, commonly referred to as MMA, means an unarmed combat sport in which two competitors seek to achieve dominance over each other by utilizing a combination of permitted martial arts techniques from disciplines of martial arts, including, but not limited to, grappling, kicking, and striking. Martial arts means any one of the disciplines set forth in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the State Athletic Commissioner.

Laws 2007, LB471, § 11.